Massachusetts, session 194th, S433.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 71, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition of the General Laws,
is hereby amended by adding after Section 99 the following section:-
Section 100. The department of elementary and secondary education in coordination with
the department of public health shall develop a model curriculum designed for the purpose of
substance use and addiction prevention which shall align with the health curriculum framework
and address the following topics: tobacco, alcohol, opiate and prescription drug diversion and
use and other substance use and use prevention, conflict resolution, healthy coping behavior,
student and community mental health resources and peer leadership. The curriculum shall take
into account the best practices and policies in other states. The adolescent substance use and
addiction prevention curriculum shall be incorporated into the health curriculum in grades 4 to
of 2

12 for all students in the public schools. The state shall fully fund all costs associated with the
implementation of this act. The model curriculum shall be developed on or before June 30, 2026.
of 2